District of Columbia statutes.
31-104

Commissioner of the Department of Insurance, Securities, and Banking.

(a)

The Commissioner shall be appointed by the Mayor, with the advice and consent of the Council, pursuant to § 1-204.22(1).

(1)

Notwithstanding the provisions of § 1-611.07(c) [repealed], the rate of pay for the Commissioner or for any other position in the Department for which the Mayor deems it necessary, may exceed the rate of pay for the Mayor.

(2)

The Mayor shall submit a resolution to the Council for a 45-day period of review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, holidays, and periods of Council recess, indicating the proposed rate of pay for the Commissioner and for each other employee in the Department. A resolution which has not been approved or disapproved, in whole or part, within the prescribed period of 45 days shall be deemed approved by the Council.

(b)

The Commissioner shall employ staff as needed, in accordance with annual appropriations.

May 21, 1997, D.C. Law 11-268, § 5, 44 DCR 1730
June 11, 2004, D.C. Law 15-166, § 3(d), 51 DCR 2817
Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-354, § 40(c), 52 DCR 2638
1981 Ed., § 35-124.
D.C. Law 15-166, deleted “of Insurance and Securities” following “Commissioner” throughout the section.
D.C. Law 15-354, in the section heading, validated a previously made technical correction.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(d) of Consolidation of Financial Services Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-381, February 27, 2004, 51 DCR 2653).
Commissioner of the Department of Insurance and Securities Regulation Salary Approval Resolution of 1998: Pursuant to Resolution 12-582, effective July 7, 1998, the Council approved the rate of pay for the Commissioner of the Department of Insurance and Securities Regulation.